Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.124

Measurement of commodities—Measuring inaccurately—Altering measuring devices—Penalty.

Every person, corporation, or association whether profit or nonprofit, who shall ask or receive, or conspire to ask or receive, directly or indirectly, any compensation, gratuity, or reward or any promise thereof, on any agreement or understanding that he or she shall (1) intentionally make an inaccurate visual or mechanical measurement or an intentionally inaccurate recording of any visual or mechanical measurement of goods, raw materials, and agricultural products (whether severed or unsevered from the land) which he or she has or will have the duty to measure, or shall (2) intentionally change, alter or affect, for the purpose of making an inaccurate measurement, any equipment or other device which is designed to measure, either qualitatively or quantitatively, such goods, raw materials, and agricultural products, or shall intentionally alter the recordation of such measurements, is guilty of a class B felony, punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 30; 1992 c 7 s 11; 1967 c 200 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.